Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 4
ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE AND OFFICERS

Cross references:

For prohibited appointments by outgoing officers, see § 24-50-402; for standards of conduct for municipal officials, see article 18 of title 24.

Section

PART 1 ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE AND
OFFICERS OF STATUTORY CITIES

PART 2 ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE -
CITIES - CITY MANAGER FORM

PART 3 ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE AND
OFFICERS OF STATUTORY TOWNS

PART 4 REQUIREMENTS AND
COMPENSATION OF OFFICERS

PART 5 OFFICERS' RECALL